District of Columbia statutes.
16-916.03

Proceedings in which child support matters may be considered.

The court may consider child support matters, as it deems appropriate, in any proceeding to determine the care and custody of a minor child or children.

Apr. 18, 1996, D.C. Law 11-112, § 2(c), 43 DCR 574
Section 28(b)(2) of D.C. Law 15-354 provided that the section designation of § 16-916.3 of the District of Columbia Official Code is redesignated as § 16-916.03.
1981 Ed., § 16-916.3.